North Dakota, session 69, SB2231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-24.1-45 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
50-24.1-45. Medical assistance benefits - Family adaptive behavior treatment and
guidance - Dental screening and assessments - Dental case management - Teledentistry.
1. Medical assistance coverage must include payment for the following services:
1. a. Family adaptive behavioral treatment and guidance to educate parents and
caregivers to continue to carry out plans and recommendations of applied
behavioral analysis.
2. b. Dental screening and assessment of patients to identify individuals in need of
additional assessment, diagnostic, and treatment services.
3. c. Dental case management for maintenance of oral health for special populations,
including elderly, special needs, medically fragile, and children.
4. d. Asynchronous teledentistry to reduce barriers to dental care through outreach
programs and to integrate oral health into general health care settings to identify
and refer treatment needs.
e. Medically necessary dental services.
5.2. The services identified in subsections 2, 3, and 4 do not subdivisions b, c, d, and e o f
subsection 1 apply to Medicaid expansion for children and adults.
Page No. 1 25.0532.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. The department shall process claims through the existing dentistry claims system of
the department and Medicaid management information system.
Page No. 2 25.0532.02000